Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.010

Preexisting approved out-of-state trust institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an out-of-state trust institution that complies with RCW 30B.38.020(1) and 30B.72.010 is exempt from the requirements of RCW 30B.38.030 and 30B.38.040.

[ 2014 c 37 s 367.]